Washington statutes.
RCW 35.81.005

Declaration of purpose and necessity.

It is hereby found and declared that blighted areas which constitute a serious and growing menace, injurious to the public health, safety, morals and welfare of the residents of the state exist in municipalities of the state; that the existence of such areas contributes substantially and increasingly to the spread of disease and crime and depreciation of property values, constitutes an economic and social liability, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of municipalities, retards the provision of housing accommodations, hinders job creation and economic growth, aggravates traffic problems and substantially impairs or arrests the elimination of traffic hazards and the improvement of traffic facilities; and that the prevention and elimination of such areas is a matter of state policy and state concern in order that the state and its municipalities shall not continue to be endangered by areas which are focal centers of disease, promote juvenile delinquency, are conducive to fires, are difficult to police and to provide police protection for, and, while contributing little to the tax income of the state and its municipalities, consume an excessive proportion of its revenues because of the extra services required for police, fire, accident, hospitalization and other forms of public protection, services, and facilities.

It is further found and declared that certain of such areas, or portions thereof, may require acquisition, clearance, and disposition subject to use restrictions, as provided in this chapter, since the prevailing condition of decay may make impracticable the reclamation of the area by rehabilitation; that other areas or portions thereof may, through the means provided in this chapter, be susceptible of rehabilitation in such a manner that the conditions and evils hereinbefore enumerated may be eliminated, remedied or prevented; and that to the extent feasible salvable blighted areas should be rehabilitated through voluntary action and the regulatory process.

It is further found and declared that there is an urgent need to enhance the ability of municipalities to act effectively and expeditiously to revive blighted areas and to prevent further blight due to shocks to the economy of the state and their actual and threatened effects on unemployment, poverty, and the availability of private capital for businesses and projects in the area.

It is further found and declared that the powers conferred by this chapter are for public uses and purposes for which public money may be expended and the power of eminent domain exercised; and that the necessity in the public interest for the provisions herein enacted is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination.

[ 2002 c 218 s 2; 1965 c 7 s 35.81.020. Prior: 1957 c 42 s 2. Formerly RCW 35.81.020.]

NOTES:

Severability—2002 c 218: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2002 c 218 s 28.]

Savings—Construction—2002 c 218: "(1) This act does not impair any authority granted, any actions undertaken, or any liability or obligation incurred under the sections amended in this act or under any rule, order, plan, or project adopted under those sections, nor does it impair any proceedings instituted under those sections.

(2) Any power granted in this act with respect to a community renewal plan, and any process authorized for the exercise of the power, may be used by any municipality in implementing any urban renewal plan or project adopted under chapter 35.81 RCW, to the same extent as if the plan were adopted as a community renewal plan.

(3) This act shall be liberally construed." [ 2002 c 218 s 29.]